Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-523
Repealed. Laws 2018, LB377, § 87. Operative date January 1, 2019. Class VI school district; board of education; powers and duties.

The board of education of a Class VI school district has the same powers and duties as and shall be governed by the provisions of law governing the school boards in Class I and II school districts for purposes authorized by law, except that the board of a Class VI district may undertake building projects and expend money from a special fund established pursuant to section 79-10,120 in the same manner and subject to the same restrictions as any Class II, III, IV, or V school district, and for such purposes section 79-10,121 shall not apply. The annual meetings as provided in section 79-556 shall not apply to any Class VI school district.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 276.